District of Columbia statutes.
2-305.04

Repealed

Payment bonds for construction contracts.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 504, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 15, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(u), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1185.4.